North Carolina statutes. Chapter 72. Inns, Hotels and Restaurants.
Article 3. Immoral Practices of Guests of Hotels and Lodging Houses.

§ 72-30.
Registration to be in true name; addresses; peace officers.

No person shall write, or cause to be written, or if in charge of a register knowingly permit to be written, in any register in any lodging house or hotel any other or different name or designation than the true name or names in ordinary use of the person registering or causing himself to be registered therein. Any person occupying any room or rooms in any lodging house or hotel shall register or cause himself to be registered where registration is required by such lodging house or hotel. Any person registering or causing himself to be registered at any lodging house or hotel, shall write, or cause to be written, in the register of such lodging house or hotel the correct address of the person registering, or causing himself to be registered. Any person violating any provision of this section shall be guilty of a Class 3 misdemeanor, and upon conviction shall only be punished by a fine not exceeding two hundred dollars ($200.00). This section shall not apply to any peace officer of this State who shall privately give his true name to the clerk or proprietor of such hotel or lodging house.

History.

1921, c. 111; C.S., s. 2283(v); 1993, c. 539, s. 546; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c).